Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska36-810
Extinguishment of claim for relief.

A claim for relief with respect to a transfer or obligation under the Uniform Voidable Transactions Act is extinguished unless action is brought:

(1) under subdivision (a)(1) of section 36-805, not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred or, if later, not later than one year after the transfer or obligation was or could reasonably have been discovered by the claimant;

(2) under subdivision (a)(2) of section 36-805 or subsection (a) of section 36-806, not later than four years after the transfer was made or the obligation was incurred; or

(3) under subsection (b) of section 36-806, not later than one year after the transfer was made.

Laws 2019, LB70, § 10.